Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.470

Cease and desist orders—Utilizing temporary order, injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus.

(1) Whenever it appears to the director that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter, any withdrawal of a camping resort property in violation of RCW 19.105.380(1)(o), or any rule, order, or permit issued under this chapter, the director may in his or her discretion issue an order directing the person to cease and desist from continuing the act or practice. The procedures in RCW 18.235.150 apply to these cease and desist orders. However, the director may issue a temporary order pending the hearing which shall be effective immediately upon delivery to the person affected and which shall remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and which shall become final if the person to whom notice is addressed does not request a hearing.

(2) If it appears necessary in order to protect the interests of members and purchasers, whether or not the director has issued a cease and desist order, the attorney general in the name of the state, the director, the proper prosecuting attorney, an affiliated members' common-interest association, or a group of members as a class, may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule, order, or permit under this chapter. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant, for the defendant's assets, or to protect the interests or assets of a members' common-interest association or the members of a camping resort as a class. The state, the director, a members' common-interest association, or members as a class shall not be required to post a bond in such proceedings.

[ 2002 c 86 s 275; 2000 c 171 s 69; 1988 c 159 s 23; 1982 c 69 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.